Texas statutes.
TRANSPORTATION CODE

TITLE 6. ROADWAYS

SUBTITLE H. HIGHWAY BEAUTIFICATION

CHAPTER 430. MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONS

Sec. 430.001. ADVISORY SAFETY OR DIRECTIONAL SIGNS. (a) A political subdivision may place along a public right-of-way under the control of the political subdivision an advisory safety or useful directional sign that cannot be mistaken as an official sign.

(b) The political subdivision may not place the sign along a state highway for revenue purposes.

Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Sec. 430.002. SIGNS ERECTED BY NEIGHBORHOOD ASSOCIATION. (a) In this section, "property owners' association" means an association described by Section 204.004, Property Code.

(b) A property owners' association may install a speed feedback sign or a solar-powered light-emitting diode (LED) stop sign on a road, highway, or street in the association's jurisdiction if:

(1) the association receives the consent of the governing body of the political subdivision that maintains the road, highway, or street for the placement of the sign; and

(2) the association pays for the installation of the sign.

(c) A property owners' association that installs a sign under this section is responsible for the maintenance of the sign.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 765 (H.B. 1737), Sec. 1, eff. June 17, 2011.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 376 (H.B. 745), Sec. 1, eff. June 10, 2015.